Louisiana, session 2026, HB907.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:978.2.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§978.2.3. Naloxone; distribution or use after shelf-life end date; limitation of
liability
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person who
prescribes, dispenses, distributes, or furnishes naloxone or another opioid antagonist
shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability solely on the basis that any labeled
shelf-life end date for such product has passed.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person acting in
good faith who furnishes or administers naloxone or another opioid antagonist,
including one for which any labeled shelf-life end date has passed, to an individual
reasonably believed to be undergoing an opioid-related drug overdose shall be
immune from criminal and civil liability for such furnishing or administration except
in the event of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
C. A licensed healthcare practitioner shall not be subject to disciplinary
action by a professional licensing board for any action for which the practitioner is
granted civil and criminal immunity under Subsections A and B of this Section.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 907 ENROLLED
D. As used in this Section, the term "shelf-life end date" means any labeled
date required by 21 CFR part 211.137 or any successor regulation.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section, a federally certified health
care provider, facility, or entity shall comply with federal regulations and
requirements, including such regulations prohibiting the prescribing, dispensing,
distributing, furnishing, or administering drugs whose shelf-life end date has passed.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the Governor or, if not
signed by the Governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without
signature by the Governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the Governor and subsequently approved by the Legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.